transducer-comparison/burmish-2.foma
define MaruRime [ [MaruOpenRhyme | MaruNasalRhyme | MaruStopRhyme] MaruTone];

define MaruSyllable [ MaruInitial MaruRime ];

clear
push MaruSyllable
save stack maru-ortho.bin

#########################################################
## A transducer from the current proto-Burmish to Maru ##
#########################################################
# Things are done the kosher way, with proper sound changes and everything


# 1. Sound laws
define r⋄Devoicing {*ʔr} -> {*rh} || .#. _ ;
define medial⋄r⇒j {*r} -> {*j} || ? _ ;
define aŋ⇒ã {*ŋ} -> {~} || {*a} _;
define ak⇒aʔ {*k} -> {*ʔ} || {*a} _;
define ap⇒at {*p} -> {*t} || {*a} _ pbTone;
define am⇒ɛ̃ {*a*m} -> {*ɛ~} || _ pbTone;
define at⇒ɛʔ {*a*t} -> {*ɛ*ʔ} || _ pbTone;
define a⇒ɔ {*a} -> {*ɔ} || _ pbTone, _ {~}, _ {*ʔ};
define an⇒əŋ {*a*n} -> {*ə*ŋ} || _ pbTone;
define kəŋ⇒kiŋ {*ə*ŋ} -> {*i*ŋ} || [k | ŋ] (h) _ pbTone;
define uk⇒auk {*u} -> {*au} || _ {*k}, _ {*ŋ};
define iC⇒aC {*i} -> {*a}, {*u} -> {*a} || _ {*ŋ}, _ {*k}, _ {*m}, _ {*p}, _ {*n}, _ {*t};
define ti⇒ta {*i} -> {*a} || [t | d | n | l ] (h) _;
define rh⇒x {*rh} -> {*x};
define r⇒ɣ {*r} -> {*ɣ};
define xy⇒ʃ {*x*j} -> {*ʃ};
define k⋄Epenthesis {*i} pbTone -> {*i*k} 入, {*u} pbTone -> {*uk} 入;
# Tone neutralized during k-Epenthesis into the two entering tones, which shows that the initial breathiness didn't neutralize at the time of the k Epenthesis
define e⇒i {*e} -> {*i} || _ pbTone;
define o⇒u {*o} -> {*u} || _ pbTone;
define ui⇒ø {*ui} -> {*ø} || j _ pbTone;

define MaruReflexes pbSyllable .o. BurmishToneSplit .o. BurmishDevoicing
 .o. r⋄Devoicing
 .o. medial⋄l⇒r
 .o. medial⋄r⇒j
 .o. aŋ⇒ã .o. ak⇒aʔ
 .o. ap⇒at
 .o. am⇒ɛ̃ .o. at⇒ɛʔ
 .o. a⇒ɔ
 .o. an⇒əŋ
 .o. kəŋ⇒kiŋ
 .o. uk⇒auk
 .o. iC⇒aC
 .o. ti⇒ta
 .o. rh⇒x
 .o. r⇒ɣ
 .o. xy⇒ʃ
 .o. k⋄Epenthesis
 .o. e⇒i
 .o. o⇒u
 .o. ui⇒ø
 ;

# 2. Orthography
define MaruInitialNotation [
  {*w} -> v,
  {*ʔ} -> 0
    || .#. _ {*}];

define MaruTenseVowelNotation [
  [ i | ɛ | a | ɔ | u | ə | ø | {ɛ~} | {ɔ~} ] -> ... "_" || .#. {*ʔ} MaruInitial ({*j}) {*} _ ]
  .o. [{*ʔ} -> 0 || .#. _ ? ** "_"];

define MaruToneNotation [Ø ? -> ³¹, X ? -> ⁵⁵, H ? -> ³⁵, 入 "[h]" -> ⁵⁵, 入 "[l]" -> ³¹ \\ _ .#.];

define Maru MaruReflexes
  ∘ MaruInitialNotation
  ∘ MaruTenseVowelNotation
  ∘ MaruToneNotation
  ∘ RemoveAsterisks;

clear
push Maru
save stack maru.bin

#########################################################
## A transducer from the current proto-Burmish to Bola ##
#########################################################

# 1. Sound laws

define BolaInitial [
   p |  p h |  m |
   p j | p h j |  m j |
   f | v |
   t |  t h | n | l |
   t s | t s h | s |
   t ʃ | t ʃ h | ʃ | ʒ | j |
   k |  k h | x | ŋ | ɣ |
   k j | k h j | ŋ j |
   0 ];

# 1. Sound laws
# PROBABLY ALREADY DEFINED FOR ANOTHER LANGUAGE
define medial⋄r⇒j {*r} -> {*j} || ? _ ;
define ʔrj⇒ʃ {*ʔr*j} -> {*ʃ} || .#. _ ; 
define ʔlj⇒ʃ {*ʔl*j} -> {*ʃ} || .#. _ ; 
define rj⇒j {*r*j} -> {*j} || .#. _ ; 
define ʔr⇒x {*ʔr} -> {*x} || .#. _ ; 
define r⇒ɣ {*r} -> {*ɣ} || .#. _ ;
define o⇒ɔ {*o} -> {*ɔ} || _ pbTone ; 
#This next one I have commented out, because it seems to only be necessary for 'silver'
#define ui⇒ø {*ui} -> {*ø} || _ pbTone ; 
#I would like to combine this next one with at⇒ɛʔ⋄an⇒ɛ̃ , but can't, because wa⇒wɔ bleeds that change
#and this change needs to bleed wa⇒wɔ. I added this for 'buy', but now it messes up ŋai⁵⁵ 'small'. 
#I think we will assume 'buy' is a loanword from Burmese.
#define ai⇒ɛ {*ai} -> {*ɛ} || _ pbTone ; 
define wa⇒wɔ {*w*a} -> {*w*ɔ} || .#. _ ; 
# ku and kruk greak to au, but not kru, so we need two changes. 
define uk⇒auk {*u} -> {*au} || _ {*k} pbTone , _ {*ŋ} pbTone ; 
define u⇒au {*u} -> {*au} || {*} \j (h) _ pbTone ; 
define ak⇒aʔ⋄auk⇒auʔ {*k} -> {*ʔ} || {*a} _ , {*au} _ ;
define aŋ⇒ɔ̃ {*a*ŋ} -> {*ɔ~} || _ pbTone ;  
define ap⇒at⋄am⇒an {*p} -> {*t}, {*m} -> {*n} || {*a} _ pbTone ;
define up⇒ap⋄um⇒am {*u} -> {*a} || _ {*p} pbTone , _ {*m} pbTone ;
define at⇒ɛʔ⋄an⇒ɛ̃ {*a*t} -> {*ɛ*ʔ}, {*a*n} -> {*ɛ~} || _ pbTone ;  
define ut⇒ɔt {*u} -> {*ɔ} || _ {*t} pbTone ; 
define ji⇒əi {*j*i} -> {*ə*i} || _ pbTone ;
define ik⇒ak {*i} -> {*a} || _ {*k}, _ {*ŋ} ;
define e⇒i {*e} -> {*i} || _ pbTone ;
define i⇒ɿ {*i} -> {*ɿ} || {*ʃ} _ pbTone, {*tʃ} _ pbTone, {tʃh} _ pbTone;
define ts⇒t {*ts} -> {*t} || .#. _ ;  

define BolaReflexes pbSyllable
  .o. BurmishToneSplit 
  .o. BurmishDevoicing 
  .o. medial⋄l⇒r 
  .o. medial⋄r⇒j 
  .o. ʔrj⇒ʃ
  .o. ʔlj⇒ʃ
  .o. rj⇒j
  .o. ʔr⇒x
  .o. r⇒ɣ
  .o. o⇒ɔ
  .o. wa⇒wɔ
  .o. uk⇒auk
  .o. u⇒au 
  .o. ak⇒aʔ⋄auk⇒auʔ 
  .o. aŋ⇒ɔ̃ 
  .o. ap⇒at⋄am⇒an 
  .o. up⇒ap⋄um⇒am
  .o. at⇒ɛʔ⋄an⇒ɛ̃
  .o. ut⇒ɔt
  .o. ji⇒əi
  .o. ik⇒ak 
  .o. e⇒i 
  .o. i⇒ɿ 
  .o. ts⇒t
  ;

# 2. Orthography
define BolaInitialNotation [
  {*w} -> v,
  {*ʔ} -> 0
    || .#. _ {*}];

define BolaTenseVowelNotation [
  [ i | ɛ | a | ɔ | u | ə | ø | {ɛ~} | {ɔ~} ] -> ... "_" || .#. {*ʔ} BolaInitial ({*j}) {*} _ ]
  .o. [{*ʔ} -> 0 || .#. _ ? ** "_"];

define BolaToneNotation [Ø ? -> ⁵⁵, X ? -> ³⁵, H ? -> ³¹, 入 "[h]" -> ⁵⁵, 入 "[l]" -> ³¹ \\ _ .#.];

define Bola BolaReflexes
  ∘ BolaInitialNotation
  ∘ BolaTenseVowelNotation
  ∘ BolaToneNotation
  ∘ RemoveAsterisks;

clear
push Bola
save stack bola.bin

########################################
## Achang-Luxi: orthographical filter ##
########################################

define LuxiSimpleInitial [
f:{f } | k:{k } | {kʰ}:{kh }
| l:{l } |m:{m } |n:{n }
| p:{p } | {pʰ}:{ph }
| s:{s } | t:{t } | {tʰ}:{th }
| w:{w } |x:{x } |z:{z }
|ŋ:{ŋ }
|ʦ:{ts } |{ʦʰ}:{tsh }
|0:{ʔ } ];

define LuxiSimpleInitial⇒ [ LuxiSimpleInitial:{i } ];

define LuxiIotizedInitial [
{kʰʲ}:{kh j }
| {kʲ}:{k j }
| {mʲ}:{m j }
| {pʰʲ}:{ph j }
| {pʲ}:{p j }
| {xʲ}:{x j }
| ȵ:{ȵ j }
| ɕ:{ɕ j }
| ʑ:{ʑ j }
| ʨ:{tɕ j }
| ʨʰ:{tɕh j } ];

define LuxiIotizedInitial⇒ [ LuxiIotizedInitial:{i m } ];

define LuxiNucleus [
a:{a }
| {ai}:{ai }
| i:{i }
| o:{o }
| u:{u }
| {ua}:{ua }
| {ui}:{ui }
| {uɛ}:{uɛ }
| ɑ:{ɑ }
| ɔ:{ɔ }
| ə:{ə }
| {əu}:{əu }
| ɛ:{ɛ }
| ɯ:{ɯ }
| m:{m } ];

define LuxiNucleus⇒ [ LuxiNucleus:{n } ];

define LuxiIotizedNucleus [
{ia}:{j a }
| {iu}:{j u }
| {iɛ}:{j ɛ } ];

define LuxiIotizedNucleus⇒ [ LuxiIotizedNucleus:{m n } ];

define LuxiCodalessSyllable [LuxiSimpleInitial LuxiNucleus | LuxiSimpleInitial LuxiIotizedNucleus | LuxiIotizedInitial LuxiNucleus ];
define LuxiCodalessSyllable⇒ [LuxiSimpleInitial⇒ LuxiNucleus⇒ | LuxiSimpleInitial⇒ LuxiIotizedNucleus⇒ | LuxiIotizedInitial⇒ LuxiNucleus⇒ ];

define LuxiCoda [
j:{j }
| k:{k }
| l:{l }
| m:{m }
| n:{n }
| p:{p }
| t:{t }
| w:{w }
| ŋ:{ŋ }
| ʔ:{ʔ } ];

define LuxiCoda⇒ [ LuxiCoda:{c } ];

define LuxiTone [{²¹}:{²¹} | {⁴⁵}:{⁴⁵} | {⁵¹}:{⁵¹} | {⁵⁵}:{⁵⁵}];

define LuxiTone⇒ [ LuxiTone:{t} ];

define LuxiSyllable [LuxiCodalessSyllable LuxiTone | LuxiCodalessSyllable LuxiCoda LuxiTone];
define LuxiSyllable⇒ [LuxiCodalessSyllable⇒ LuxiTone⇒ | LuxiCodalessSyllable⇒ LuxiCoda⇒ LuxiTone⇒];

clear
push LuxiSyllable
save stack luxi-ortho.bin

clear
push LuxiSyllable⇒
save stack luxi-ortho-template.bin
